North Carolina, session 2025, HB811.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-317 is amended by adding two new subsections to read:
"(b1) Within 30 days of the completion of the revaluation of real property required by
G.S. 105-286, it shall be the duty of the assessor to see that notice of the following is given in
writing to the owner:
(1) The appraised value of the property based upon the most recent revaluation.
(2) The appraised value of the property based upon the revaluation immediately
preceding the most recent revaluation.
(3) The percentage increase or decrease between subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection.
(4) Instructions to property owners for appealing the newly appraised value of
property, which shall include necessary time lines for filing an appeal.
(5) The tax rates in effect in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
(6) Relevant government department contact information for property owners,
including telephone numbers and email addresses, and instructions on where
property owners may find previously adopted government budgets.
(b2) During any year in which a revaluation of real property is conducted, the assessor
shall include with the annual tax notice the following information for all governments in the
county that adopted a tax rate:
(1) The tax rate in effect in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
(2) The revenue-neutral tax rate required by G.S. 159-11.
(3) The tax rate adopted in the year of the revaluation.
(4) The percentage increase or decrease between subdivisions (2) and (3) of this
subsection.
(5) Relevant government department contact information for property owners,
including telephone numbers and email addresses, and instructions on where
property owners may find previously adopted government budgets."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 105-328 is amended by adding two new subsections to read:
*H811-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(b1) Within 30 days of the completion of the revaluation of real property conducted
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, it shall be the duty of the assessor to see that notice of
the following is given in writing to the owner:
(1) The appraised value of the property based upon the most recent revaluation.
(2) The appraised value of the property based upon the revaluation immediately
preceding the most recent revaluation.
(3) The percentage increase or decrease between subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection.
(4) Instructions to property owners for appealing the newly appraised value of
property, which shall include necessary time lines for filing an appeal.
(5) The tax rates in effect in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
(6) Relevant government department contact information, including telephone
numbers and email addresses, and instructions on where property owners may
find previously adopted government budgets.
(b2) During any year in which a revaluation of real property is conducted pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, the assessor shall include with the annual tax notice the following
information for all governments in the county that adopted a tax rate:
(1) The tax rate in effect in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
(2) The revenue-neutral tax rate required by G.S. 159-11.
(3) The tax rate adopted in the year of the revaluation.
(4) The percentage increase or decrease between subdivisions (2) and (3) of this
subsection.
(5) Instructions on where property owners may find previously adopted
government budgets."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 159-11 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(f) The budget officer shall publish an estimate of the revenue-neutral rate required under
subsection (e) of this section on the government's official website no later than May 15 of each
year in which a general reappraisal of real property is conducted. The estimate required by this
subsection shall be calculated using a standard template developed by the Local Government
Commission. Upon adoption of the annual budget for a year in which a revaluation is conducted,
the budget officer shall update the government's official website, no later than July 15, to include
the following:
(1) The tax rate in effect in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
(2) The revenue-neutral tax rate required under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) The tax rate adopted in the year of the revaluation.
(4) The percentage increase or decrease between subdivisions (2) and (3) of this
subsection.
(5) Contact information for the government budget office.
(6) Instructions on where property owners may find previously adopted
government budgets."
SECTION 2.(b) The Local Government Commission shall develop and distribute to
local governments the standard template required by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and is effective for
reappraisals effective on or after January 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 811-First Edition